South Dakota, session 2026, HB1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 57A-8-110 be AMENDED:
57A-8-110. (a) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction, as specified in subsection
(d), governs:
(1) The validity of a security;
(2) The rights and duties of the issuer with respect to registration of transfer;
(3) The effectiveness of registration of transfer by the issuer;
(4) Whether the issuer owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security; and
(5) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to whom transfer of a
certificated or uncertificated security is registered or a person who obtains control
of an uncertificated security.
(b) The local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction, as specified in
subsection (e), this state governs:
(1) Acquisition of a security entitlement from the securities intermediary;
(2) The rights and duties of the securities intermediary and entitlement holder arising
out of a security entitlement;
(3) Whether the securities intermediary owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a
security entitlement; and
(4) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person who acquires a security
entitlement from the securities intermediary or a person who purchases a security
entitlement or interest therein from an entitlement holder.
(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which a security certificate is located at the
time of delivery governs whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to
whom the security certificate is delivered.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.804.9 2 1248
(d) "Issuer's jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction under which the issuer of the
security is organized or, if permitted by the law of that jurisdiction, the law of another
jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An issuer organized under the law of this State may
specify the law of another jurisdiction as the law governing the matters specified in
subsection (a)(2) through (5).
(e) The following rules determine a "securities intermediary's jurisdiction" for
purposes of this section:
(1) If an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder
governing the securities account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is
the securities intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this article, or
this chapter, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.
(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement between the securities
intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly
provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that
jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.
(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies and an agreement between the
securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account
expressly provides that the securities account is maintained at an office in a
particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.
(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement
as the office serving the entitlement holder's account is located.
(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the securities
intermediary is located.
(f) A securities intermediary's jurisdiction is not determined by the physical location of
certificates representing financial assets, or by the jurisdiction in which is organized
the issuer of the financial asset with respect to which an entitlement holder has a
security entitlement, or by the location of facilities for data processing or other
record keeping concerning the account.
(g) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction or the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction governs a matter or transaction specified in subsection (a) or (b), even if the
matter or transaction does not bear any relation to the jurisdiction.
Section 2. That § 57A-8-503 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.804.9 3 1248
57A-8-503. (a) To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy all
security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in that
financial asset held by the securities intermediary are held by the securities intermediary
for the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities intermediary, and are not
subject to claims of creditors of the securities intermediary, except as otherwise provided
in § 57A-8-511.
(b) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular financial
asset under subsection (a) is a pro rata property interest in all interests in that financial
asset held by the securities intermediary, without regard to the time the entitlement
holder acquired the security entitlement or the time the securities intermediary acquired
the interest in that financial asset.
(c) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular financial
asset under subsection (a) may be enforced against the securities intermediary only by
exercise of the entitlement holder's rights under §§ 57A-8-505 to 57A-8-508, inclusive.
(d) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular financial
asset under subsection (a) may be enforced against a purchaser of the financial asset or
interest therein only if:
(1) Insolvency proceedings have been initiated by or against the securities
intermediary;
(2) The securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in the financial asset
to satisfy the security entitlements of all of its entitlement holders to that financial
asset;
(3) The securities intermediary violated its obligations under § 57A-8-504 by
transferring the financial asset or interest therein to the purchaser; and
(4) The purchaser is not protected under subsection (e).
The trustee or other liquidator, acting on behalf of all entitlement holders having
security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, may recover the financial
asset, or interest therein, from the purchaser. If the trustee or other liquidator elects not
to pursue that right, an entitlement holder whose security entitlement remains unsatisfied
has the right to recover its interest in the financial asset from the purchaser.
(e) An action based on the entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a
particular financial asset under subsection (a), whether framed in conversion, replevin,
constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against any
purchaser of a financial asset or interest therein who gives value, obtains control, and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.804.9 4 1248
does not act in collusion with the securities intermediary in violating the securities
intermediary's obligations under § 57A-8-504.
Section 3. That § 57A-8-511 be AMENDED:
57A-8-511. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), ifIf a
securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in a particular financial asset to
satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements to that
financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a
security interest in that financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other than the
creditor, have priority over the claim of the creditor.
(b) A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a security interest in
a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has priority over claims of the securities
intermediary's entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to that
financial asset if the creditor has control over the financial asset.
(c) If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets to satisfy both
its obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to a
financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security
interest in that financial asset, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of
entitlement holders.
Section 4. That § 57A-9-305 be AMENDED:
57A-9-305. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the following rules
apply:
(1) While a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that
jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the
priority of a security interest in the certificated security represented thereby.;
(2) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction as specified in § 57A-8-110(d) governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security
interest in an uncertificated security.;
(3) The local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction as specified in § 57A-8-
110(e) this state governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and
the priority of a security interest in a security entitlement or securities account.;
and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.804.9 5 1248
(4) The local law of the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction governs perfection, the
effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a
commodity contract or commodity account.
(5) Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) apply even if the transaction does not bear any
relation to the jurisdiction.
(b) The following rules determine a commodity intermediary's jurisdiction for
purposes of this part:
(1) If an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer
governing the commodity account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction
is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this chapter,
or the Uniform Commercial Code, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's
jurisdiction.;
(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement between the commodity
intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account
expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular
jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.;
(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies and an agreement between the
commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity
account expressly provides that the commodity account is maintained at an office
in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's
jurisdiction.;
(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the commodity intermediary's
jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement
as the office serving the commodity customer's account is located.;
(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the commodity intermediary's
jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the commodity
intermediary is located.; and
(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located governs:
(1) perfection of a security interest in investment property by filing;
(2) automatic perfection of a security interest in investment property created by a
broker or securities intermediary; and
(3) automatic perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity
account created by a commodity intermediary.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.